Illinois, session 104th, HB2490.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Firefighter Paid Family Leave Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Family Member" means a firefighter's child, stepchild, 8spouse, domestic partner, sibling, parent, mother-in-law, 9father-in-law, grandchild, grandparent, or step-parent. 10    "Firefighter" has the meaning set forth in Section 4-106 11of the Illinois Pension Code. "Firefighter" includes an 12individual eligible to participate in a fund established under 13under Article 4 of the Illinois Pension Code, an individual 14who is not eligible to participate in a fund established under 15Article 4 who is employed on a full-time basis as a firefighter 16or paramedic, and a firefighter paramedic who is employed by a 17municipality or fire protection district to perform duties as 18a paramedic, emergency medical technician (EMT), emergency 19medical technician basic (EMT-B), emergency medical 20technician-intermediate (EMT-I), or advanced emergency medical 21technician (A-EMT).22    "Serious health condition" means an illness, impairment, 23or physical or mental condition that requires inpatient care   HB2490 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 08298 SPS 18349 b1in a hospital, hospice, or residential medical care facility 2or continuing medical treatment or continuing supervision by a 3health care provider. 4    Section 10. Paid family leave. 5    (a) A firefighter shall receive 6 weeks of paid family 6leave that may be used for the following:7        (1) for the birth of a child and to care for a newborn 8    child; 9        (2) to care for a newly adopted child under 18 years of 10    age, a newly placed foster child under 18 years of age, or 11    a newly adopted or placed foster child older than 18 years 12    of age if the child is incapable of self-care because of a 13    mental or physical disability; and14        (3) to care for a family member with a serious health 15    condition.16    (b) An employer shall reasonably accommodate additional 17physical recovery time for a firefighter returning from leave 18used for the purpose described in paragraph (1) of subsection 19(a), including light-duty assignments or an agreed to 20reassignment of duties until the firefighter is able to return 21to full duties.22    (c) The employer shall compensate a firefighter granted 23leave under this Act at the firefighter's regular rate of pay, 24paid at the same interval the firefighter was paid while 25working, for those regular work hours during which the   HB2490 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 08298 SPS 18349 b1firefighter is absent from work. 2    Section 15. Employment protection; maintenance of 3benefits.4    (a) A firefighter who takes leave under this Act shall be 5entitled, on return from leave, to be restored by the employer 6to the position of employment held by the firefighter when the 7leave commenced, or to be restored to an equivalent position 8with equivalent employment benefits, pay, and other terms and 9conditions of employment.10    (b) A firefighter who takes leave under this Act shall not 11lose any employment benefit accrued by the firefighter prior 12to the date on which the leave commenced. 13    Section 20. Prohibited acts.14    (a) No employer shall discharge, expel, or otherwise 15discriminate against a person because the person has filed or 16communicated to the employer an intent to file a claim, a 17complaint, or an appeal or has testified or is about to testify 18or has assisted in any proceeding, under this Act, at any time.19    (b) It is unlawful for any employer to threaten to take or 20take any adverse action against a firefighter because the 21firefighter:22        (1) exercises rights or attempts to exercise rights 23    under this Act;24        (2) opposes practices which the firefighter believes   HB2490 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 08298 SPS 18349 b1    to be in violation of this Act; or2        (3) supports the exercise of the rights of another 3    under this Act.4    (c) It is unlawful for any employer to consider the use of 5paid leave by a firefighter as a negative factor in any 6employment action that involves evaluating, promoting, 7disciplining, or counting paid leave under a no-fault 8attendance policy. 9    Section 25. Limitations. The paid family leave 10requirements established by this Act shall be provided to a 11firefighter who has been employed by an employer for at least 12one year, regardless of the employer's leave policies. 13    Section 30. Waiver. A firefighter may voluntarily waive 14the paid family leave requirement established by this Act by 15returning to work before the 6 weeks of leave have elapsed or 16by declining, in writing, to accept the paid family leave. 17    Section 35. Collective bargaining agreements. Unless 18otherwise provided in a collective bargaining agreement, 19nothing in this Act shall be construed to waive or otherwise 20limit a firefighter's right to final compensation for any type 21of leave promised to be paid under contract of employment. 22    Section 40. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate   HB2490 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 08298 SPS 18349 b1the provision of paid family leave to firefighters in a manner 2more restrictive than the regulation by the State of the 3provision of paid family leave to firefighters under this Act. 4This Section is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 5of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 6exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 7by the State. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.